Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 13

Charitable Beneficiaries

35-13-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Charitable Beneficiaries Act of 1997.”

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 2, provides that this chapter shall take effect upon becoming law as to all estates or trusts under administration or other entities administering a charitable gift or discretionary charitable gift, regardless of the date of the gift instrument or when administration began, the public welfare requiring it.

Cross-References. Charitable Gift Annuity Act, title 56, ch. 52.

Law Reviews.

Conversions of Nonprofit Hospitals to For-Profit Status: The Tennessee Experience, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1077 (1998).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Is Federalization of Charity Law All Bad? What States Can Learn from the Internal Revenue Code, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1621 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: In Search of the Probate Exception, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1533 (2014).

35-13-102. Purpose — Chapter definitions.

This chapter declares that the public policy of this state, as declared in its cases and statutes, favors gifts to charity that improve the general welfare through acts of philanthropy.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Attorney general and reporter” means the attorney general and reporter of Tennessee or the attorney general and reporter's designee;

“Charitable beneficiary” means the United States, any state that is part of the United States, or any political subdivision of a state, the District of Columbia, any corporation, trust, fraternal society or other organization described in §§ 170(b)(1)(A), 170(c), 2055(a) and 2522(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. §§ 170(b)(1)(A), 170(c), 2055(a) and 2522(a)), that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. §§ 170(b)(1)(A), 170(c), 2055(a) and 2522(a)), or any church, synagogue, other religious organization, or any other organization, entity or association to which a gift would be deductible under §§ 170(b)(1)(A), 170(c), 2055(a) and 2522(a) of the Internal Revenue Code;

“Charitable gift” means any gift clearly intended for charitable purposes;

“Charitable purpose” means any purpose generally considered charitable at common law, or for any charitable purpose under any section of Tennessee Code Annotated, or for any purpose described in §§ 170(b)(1)(A), 170(c), 2055(a) and 2522(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. A reference to the applicable section or sections of Tennessee Code Annotated or the Internal Revenue Code sufficiently describes the charitable purposes of the gift;

“Court” means the chancery court or other court exercising equity jurisdiction or a probate court of record;

“Discretionary charitable gift” means a charitable gift that has indefinite beneficiaries, objects, purposes or subjects;

“Donor” means the person making the lifetime or testamentary charitable gift;

“Gift instrument” means a will, deed, grant, conveyance, trust agreement, memorandum, writing or other governing document that creates the charitable gift;

“Internal Revenue Code” means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (U.S.C. title 26); and

“Tax-exempt” means that the organization, trust or beneficiary referred to is one that is described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The words “humane,” “beneficial,” “beneficent,” “worthy,” “philanthropic,” “humanitarian” or their derivatives or similar language in the gift instrument shall be presumed to be synonyms for “charitable” as used in this chapter, unless expressly indicated not to be charitable by the context in which they are used.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-103. Gift instrument to control disposition of gift.

A gift instrument that specifies the charitable beneficiaries, objects, purposes or subjects of the charitable gift controls the disposition or administration of the charitable gift, except as provided in §§ 35-13-114 and 35-13-107.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-13-104 (Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1), concerning the definiteness of gift a instrument, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 98, effective July 1, 2004.

35-13-105. Discretionary charitable gifts.

When the donor makes a discretionary charitable gift the following provisions apply:

The person to whom discretion is given shall choose the charitable beneficiaries and charitable purposes within a reasonable time after having accepted the duty to select the beneficiaries or purposes of the discretionary charitable gift.

If a donor makes a testamentary discretionary charitable gift not in trust and does not expressly designate the person to select the charitable beneficiaries or the charitable purposes, the personal representative of the donor's estate shall select the beneficiaries or the charitable purposes, or both, of the gift.

If a donor makes a testamentary discretionary charitable gift in trust and does not expressly designate the person to select the charitable beneficiaries or the charitable purposes, the trustee shall select the charitable beneficiaries or the charitable purposes, or both, of the gift and, if appropriate, shall establish a trust or charitable corporation or other legal entity to implement the discretionary charitable gift.

If the court receives notice that the person having the discretion is not ready, willing or able to perform the selection duties within a reasonable time or to establish the trust or other organization, the court shall select the person to exercise the discretion. If the discretionary gift is in trust, the court may exercise the power granted under the Uniform Trust Code, compiled in chapter 15 of this title.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-13-106 (Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1), concerning the illegality, impossibility, or impracticability of gifts, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 99, effective July 1, 2004.

35-13-107. Change in tax-exempt status of beneficiary.

IF:

a gift made to a trust is to take effect at a date later than the date of the gift instrument; and

when the gift instrument is executed, the gift to the trust would qualify for a charitable deduction under the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.), if the gift were then effective; and

the trust, or beneficiary of the trust, loses its tax-exempt status before the gift takes effect; THEN

the donor shall be presumed to have intended that the trust should be tax-exempt when the gift was to take effect, unless the donor clearly indicated in the gift instrument that the designated beneficiary should receive the gift even if the gift is not eligible for the charitable deduction. The court has jurisdiction to reform the trust by selecting another tax-exempt beneficiary, or to select another tax-exempt trust, and to select one (1) or more charitable purposes of the gift.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-108. Validity under rules of remoteness or rule against perpetuities.

No charitable gift shall fail for remoteness of vesting or for any violation of the rule against perpetuities.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Perpetuities and the Genius of a Free State, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1823 (2014).

35-13-109. Validity where no trustee.

No trust to which a charitable gift or a discretionary charitable gift is or has been made shall fail for lack of a trustee. If there is no trustee, the title to any trust property intended for a charitable purpose shall vest in the clerk of the court that has jurisdiction and venue of the trust as determined under § 35-13-110 until the court either appoints a trustee or orders distribution of the gift.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-110. Attorney general and reporter to be party to court actions affecting gifts — Court approval of disposition.

In all court actions directly affecting the amount, administration or disposition of a charitable gift or a discretionary charitable gift, the court may require that the attorney general and reporter be made a party to represent the charitable beneficiaries, potential charitable beneficiaries and all citizens of the state in all legal matters pertaining to the amount, administration and disposition of a charitable gift or discretionary charitable gift. The attorney general and reporter may sue and be sued, and, insofar as the suit against the attorney general and reporter is against the state, the state expressly consents to be sued. The attorney general and reporter may designate a district attorney general to prosecute or defend any court action.

It is unlawful to settle any litigation concerning the validity of a charitable gift or discretionary charitable gift without first obtaining the approval of the court. The court shall approve a settlement only after determining that the interest of the people of the state, as true beneficiaries of any charitable gift, has been served.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-111. Venue of court action.

If the gift instrument is a will and the estate is in administration, or if the gift under a will is not in trust, the venue of any court action is in the county in which the donor's will was or is being administered.

If the gift instrument is an inter-vivos trust or a testamentary trust under a fully administered will, venue of any court action shall be in any county in which a trustee resides, or is located if not an individual, or in which a majority of the beneficiaries, or potential beneficiaries, reside or are located.

If neither subsection (a) nor (b) applies, venue is in Davidson County, in a court of competent jurisdiction; provided, that the court may transfer the court action to a more convenient forum.

With the consent of the court in which an action is pending, the parties may waive the venue provisions of subsections (a), (b) and (c).

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-112. Trust in violation of state or federal law.

If the department of revenue makes a written determination that the operation of a charitable trust violates § 35-9-101 or if the Internal Revenue Service makes such a written determination with respect to the corresponding provisions of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.), and provides the written determination to the trustee, the trustee shall furnish a copy of the determination to the attorney general and reporter, and any other person may notify the attorney general and reporter of the determination. The attorney general and reporter may take any action that is deemed necessary to protect the interest of the people of the state.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-113. Construction with other laws.

This chapter is deemed cumulative to any equitable doctrine or remedy or statute having for its object the same or similar purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 300, § 1.

35-13-114. Cy pres.

Section 35-15-413 shall also apply to charitable gifts, as defined in § 35-13-102, whether given before or after April 12, 2007, on the same basis as charitable trusts.

Acts 2007, ch. 24, § 34.